District of Columbia statutes.
22-1717

Permissible gambling activities.

Nothing in subchapter I of this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the operation of or participation in lotteries and/or daily numbers games operated by and for the benefit of the District of Columbia by the Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board; bingo, raffles, and Monte Carlo night parties organized for educational and charitable purposes, regulated by the District of Columbia Lottery and Charitable Games Control Board.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 3, 27 DCR 4736
Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-220, § 2(a)(2), 34 DCR 900
This section is referenced in § 22-1718.
1981 Ed., § 22-1517.